North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-68.1 American Indian Language Preservation

15-68.1-01.
American Indian language preservation committee — Membership — Meetings.

The American Indian language preservation committee consists of:

The executive director of the Indian affairs commission, who shall serve as the chairman;

The superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent’s designee;

An individual employed as a faculty member at a tribal college, appointed by the governor;

The director of the state historical society;

The chairman of the North Dakota humanities council;

The chairman of the university of North Dakota department of Indian studies or the chairman’s designee; and

One individual with experience in the development of curriculum pertaining to and the teaching of American Indian languages at the elementary or high school levels, appointed by the governor.

The committee shall meet at least quarterly, at the call of the chairman.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 169, § 1.

15-68.1-02.
Duties.

The committee shall:

Develop a process for the orderly preservation of American Indian languages spoken by the members of tribes located in this state, including:

The creation or acquisition of audio recordings, picture dictionaries, and pronunciation guides;

The translation of existing materials; and

The acquisition, development, and dissemination of instructional materials for elementary and high school students, individuals enrolled in institutions of higher education, and other adults;

Pursue working relationships aimed at American Indian language preservation with public and private sector entities, including institutions of higher education, in this state and in other states and provinces; and

Seek the active participation of American Indians residing in this state on an individual and a tribal basis.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 169, § 2.

15-68.1-03.
Powers — Continuing appropriation.

The committee may:

Accept gifts, grants, and donations of money, property, and services to carry out this chapter;

Expend moneys received under this section to carry out this chapter; and

Contract with any person for any purpose related to this chapter.

Any moneys received by the committee under this section are appropriated to the committee on a continuing basis.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 169, § 3.